Louisiana, session 2026, HB879.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
9 Section 1. R.S. 30:1116 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
10 §1116. Payments to landowners
11 At least one quarter of the gross credits earned by storage operators pursuant
12 to 26 U.S.C. 45Q for the sequestration of carbon dioxide shall be paid to the owners
13 in interest in the storage facility. The payments shall be allocated according to the
14 proportionate share of the total surface acreage contributed to the storage facility.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-685 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 879